Illinois, session 104th, HB2878.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sports Wagering Act is amended by changing 5Sections 25-10 and 25-45 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 45/25-10)7    Sec. 25-10. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Adjusted gross sports wagering receipts" means a master 9sports wagering licensee's gross sports wagering receipts, 10less winnings paid to wagerers in such games.11    "Athlete" means any current or former professional athlete 12or collegiate athlete.13    "Board" means the Illinois Gaming Board.14    "Covered persons" includes athletes; umpires, referees, 15and officials; personnel associated with clubs, teams, 16leagues, and athletic associations; medical professionals 17(including athletic trainers) who provide services to athletes 18and players; and the family members and associates of these 19persons where required to serve the purposes of this Act.20    "Department" means the Department of the Lottery.21    "Gaming facility" means a facility at which gambling 22operations are conducted under the Illinois Gambling Act, 23pari-mutuel wagering is conducted under the Illinois Horse   HB2878- 2 -LRB104 07766 LNS 17811 b1Racing Act of 1975, or sports wagering is conducted under this 2Act.3    "Official league data" means statistics, results, 4outcomes, and other data related to a sports event obtained 5pursuant to an agreement with the relevant sports governing 6body, or an entity expressly authorized by the sports 7governing body to provide such information to licensees, that 8authorizes the use of such data for determining the outcome of 9tier 2 sports wagers on such sports events.10    "Organization licensee" has the meaning given to that term 11in the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975.12    "Owners licensee" means the holder of an owners license 13under the Illinois Gambling Act.14    "Person" means an individual, partnership, committee, 15association, corporation, or any other organization or group 16of persons.17    "Personal biometric data" means an athlete's information 18derived from DNA, heart rate, blood pressure, perspiration 19rate, internal or external body temperature, hormone levels, 20glucose levels, hydration levels, vitamin levels, bone 21density, muscle density, and sleep patterns.22    "Prohibited conduct" includes any statement, action, and 23other communication intended to influence, manipulate, or 24control a betting outcome of a sporting contest or of any 25individual occurrence or performance in a sporting contest in 26exchange for financial gain or to avoid financial or physical   HB2878- 3 -LRB104 07766 LNS 17811 b1harm. "Prohibited conduct" includes statements, actions, and 2communications made to a covered person by a third party, such 3as a family member or through social media. "Prohibited 4conduct" does not include statements, actions, or 5communications made or sanctioned by a team or sports 6governing body.7    "Qualified applicant" means an applicant for a license 8under this Act whose application meets the mandatory minimum 9qualification criteria as required by the Board.10    "Sporting contest" means a sports event or game on which 11the State allows sports wagering to occur under this Act. 12    "Sports event" means a professional sport or athletic 13event, a collegiate sport or athletic event, a motor race 14event, or any other event or competition of relative skill 15authorized by the Board under this Act.16    "Sports facility" means a facility that hosts sports 17events and holds a seating capacity greater than 17,000 18persons, except in a municipality with a population of more 19than 1,000,000, a seating capacity greater than 10,000 20persons.21    "Sports governing body" means the organization that 22prescribes final rules and enforces codes of conduct with 23respect to a sports event and participants therein. 24    "Sports wagering" means accepting wagers on sports events 25or portions of sports events, or on the individual performance 26statistics of athletes in a sports event or combination of   HB2878- 4 -LRB104 07766 LNS 17811 b1sports events, by any system or method of wagering, including, 2but not limited to, in person or over the Internet through 3websites and on mobile devices. "Sports wagering" includes, 4but is not limited to, single-game bets, teaser bets, parlays, 5over-under, moneyline, pools, exchange wagering, in-game 6wagering, in-play bets, proposition bets, and straight bets. 7    "Sports wagering account" means a financial record 8established by a master sports wagering licensee for an 9individual patron in which the patron may deposit and withdraw 10funds for sports wagering and other authorized purchases and 11to which the master sports wagering licensee may credit 12winnings or other amounts due to that patron or authorized by 13that patron.14    "Tier 1 sports wager" means a sports wager that is 15determined solely by the final score or final outcome of the 16sports event and is placed before the sports event has begun. 17    "Tier 2 sports wager" means a sports wager that is not a 18tier 1 sports wager.19    "Wager" means a sum of money or thing of value risked on an 20uncertain occurrence.21    "Winning bidder" means a qualified applicant for a master 22sports wagering license chosen through the competitive 23selection process under Section 25-45.24(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-689, eff. 12-17-21.) 25    (230 ILCS 45/25-45)  HB2878- 5 -LRB104 07766 LNS 17811 b1    Sec. 25-45. Master sports wagering license issued to an 2online sports wagering operator.3    (a) The Board may issue master sports wagering licenses to 4persons to conduct sports wagering over the Internet or 5through a mobile application. The Board shall issue 3 master 6sports wagering licenses to online sports wagering operators 7for a nonrefundable license fee of $20,000,000 pursuant to an 8open and competitive selection process. The master sports 9wagering license issued under this Section may be renewed 10every 4 years upon payment of a $1,000,000 renewal fee. To the 11extent permitted by federal and State law, the Board shall 12actively seek to achieve racial, ethnic, and geographic 13diversity when issuing master sports wagering licenses under 14this Section and encourage minority-owned businesses, 15women-owned businesses, veteran-owned businesses, and 16businesses owned by persons with disabilities to apply for 17licensure.18    For the purposes of this subsection (a), "minority-owned 19business", "women-owned business", and "business owned by 20persons with disabilities" have the meanings given to those 21terms in Section 2 of the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 22Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act.23    (b) Applicants shall pay to the Board a nonrefundable 24application fee in the amount of $250,000. The initial license 25fee for a master sports wagering license issued to an online 26sports wagering operator is $15,000,000. The master sports   HB2878- 6 -LRB104 07766 LNS 17811 b1wagering license is valid for 4 years. Applications for the 2initial competitive selection occurring after the effective 3date of this Act shall be received by the Board within 540 days 4after the first license is issued under this Act to qualify. 5The Board shall announce the winning bidders for the initial 6competitive selection within 630 days after the first license 7is issued under this Act, and this time frame may be extended 8at the discretion of the Board.9    (c) A licensee may renew the master sports wagering 10license for a period of 4 years by paying a $1,000,000 renewal 11fee to the Board. The Board shall provide public notice of its 12intent to solicit applications for master sports wagering 13licenses under this Section by posting the notice, application 14instructions, and materials on its website for at least 30 15calendar days before the applications are due. Failure by an 16applicant to submit all required information may result in the 17application being disqualified. The Board may notify an 18applicant that its application is incomplete and provide an 19opportunity to cure by rule. Application instructions shall 20include a brief overview of the selection process and how 21applications are scored.22    (d) A master sports wagering licensee may conduct sports 23wagering over the Internet or through a mobile application. To 24be eligible for a master sports wagering license under this 25Section, an applicant must: (1) be at least 21 years of age; 26(2) not have been convicted of a felony offense or a violation   HB2878- 7 -LRB104 07766 LNS 17811 b1of Article 28 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 2of 2012 or a similar statute of any other jurisdiction; (3) not 3have been convicted of a crime involving dishonesty or moral 4turpitude; (4) have demonstrated a level of skill or knowledge 5that the Board determines to be necessary in order to operate 6sports wagering; and (5) have met standards for the holding of 7a license as adopted by rules of the Board.8    The Board may adopt rules to establish additional 9qualifications and requirements to preserve the integrity and 10security of sports wagering in this State and to promote and 11maintain a competitive sports wagering market. After the close 12of the application period, the Board shall determine whether 13the applications meet the mandatory minimum qualification 14criteria and conduct a comprehensive, fair, and impartial 15evaluation of all qualified applications.16    (e) (Blank). The Board shall open all qualified 17applications in a public forum and disclose the applicants' 18names. The Board shall summarize the terms of the proposals 19and make the summaries available to the public on its website.20    (f) (Blank). Not more than 90 days after the publication 21of the qualified applications, the Board shall identify the 22winning bidders. In granting the licenses, the Board may give 23favorable consideration to qualified applicants presenting 24plans that provide for economic development and community 25engagement. To the extent permitted by federal and State law, 26the Board may give favorable consideration to qualified   HB2878- 8 -LRB104 07766 LNS 17811 b1applicants demonstrating commitment to diversity in the 2workplace.3    (g) (Blank). Upon selection of the winning bidders, the 4Board shall have a reasonable period of time to ensure 5compliance with all applicable statutory and regulatory 6criteria before issuing the licenses. If the Board determines 7a winning bidder does not satisfy all applicable statutory and 8regulatory criteria, the Board shall select another bidder 9from the remaining qualified applicants.10    (h) (Blank). Nothing in this Section is intended to confer 11a property or other right, duty, privilege, or interest 12entitling an applicant to an administrative hearing upon 13denial of an application.14    (i) (Blank). Upon issuance of a master sports wagering 15license to a winning bidder, the information and plans 16provided in the application become a condition of the license. 17A master sports wagering licensee under this Section has a 18duty to disclose any material changes to the application. 19Failure to comply with the conditions or requirements in the 20application may subject the master sports wagering licensee 21under this Section to discipline, including, but not limited 22to, fines, suspension, and revocation of its license, pursuant 23to rules adopted by the Board.24    (j) (Blank). The Board shall disseminate information about 25the licensing process through media demonstrated to reach 26large numbers of business owners and entrepreneurs who are   HB2878- 9 -LRB104 07766 LNS 17811 b1minorities, women, veterans, and persons with disabilities.2    (k) (Blank). The Department of Commerce and Economic 3Opportunity, in conjunction with the Board, shall conduct 4ongoing, thorough, and comprehensive outreach to businesses 5owned by minorities, women, veterans, and persons with 6disabilities about contracting and entrepreneurial 7opportunities in sports wagering. This outreach shall include, 8but not be limited to:9        (1) cooperating and collaborating with other State 10    boards, commissions, and agencies; public and private 11    universities and community colleges; and local governments 12    to target outreach efforts; and13        (2) working with organizations serving minorities, 14    women, and persons with disabilities to establish and 15    conduct training for employment in sports wagering.16    (l) (Blank). The Board shall partner with the Department 17of Labor, the Department of Financial and Professional 18Regulation, and the Department of Commerce and Economic 19Opportunity to identify employment opportunities within the 20sports wagering industry for job seekers and dislocated 21workers.22    (m) By March 1, 2020, the Board shall prepare a request for 23proposals to conduct a study of the online sports wagering 24industry and market to determine whether there is a compelling 25interest in implementing remedial measures, including the 26application of the Business Enterprise Program under the   HB2878- 10 -LRB104 07766 LNS 17811 b1Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 2Disabilities Act or a similar program to assist minorities, 3women, and persons with disabilities in the sports wagering 4industry.5    As a part of the study, the Board shall evaluate race and 6gender-neutral programs or other methods that may be used to 7address the needs of minority and women applicants and 8minority-owned and women-owned businesses seeking to 9participate in the sports wagering industry. The Board shall 10submit to the General Assembly and publish on its website the 11results of this study by August 1, 2020.12    If, as a result of the study conducted under this 13subsection (m), the Board finds that there is a compelling 14interest in implementing remedial measures, the Board may 15adopt rules, including emergency rules, to implement remedial 16measures, if necessary and to the extent permitted by State 17and federal law, based on the findings of the study conducted 18under this subsection (m).19(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.